apertium-grn.grn.twol
Alphabet

A B Ã C D E Ẽ G G̃ H I Ĩ J K L M N Ñ O Õ P R S T U Ũ V W X Y Z Ỹ Á É Í Ó Ú Ý   F Q
a b ã c d e ẽ g g̃ h i ĩ j k l m n ñ o õ p r s t u ũ v w x y z ỹ á é í ó ú ý ʼ f q


%{J%}:j %{J%}:ñ
%{P%}:ʼ %{P%}:0
%{I%}:0 %{I%}:j %{I%}:ñ %{I%}:ʼ
%{H%}:0 %{H%}:h
%{K%}:k %{K%}:g 
%{N%}:0 %{N%}:n 
%{D%}:d %{D%}:0 
%{T%}:0
%{p%}:0 %{p%}:r
%{E%}:i %{E%}:e
%{d%}:d %{d%}:0 
%{r%}:0 %{r%}:r
•:0
%{o%}:0
%{e%}:e %{e%}:a %{e%}:o 
%{Y%}:0 %{Y%}:y 
%{m%}:m %{m%}:p
%{t%}:0
%{a%}:0 %{a%}:a %{a%}:e %{a%}:o 
%{b%}:p %{b%}:b %{b%}:0 
%{i%}:0 %{i%}:i
%{g%}:0 

%>:%>
% 
%'
%+
%-
;

!TEST COMMIT

Sets

Nas = m n ñ ã ẽ ĩ õ ỹ ũ
      M N Ñ Ã Ẽ Ĩ Õ Ỹ Ũ ;

NasTil = ñ ã ẽ ĩ õ ỹ ũ
         Ñ Ã Ẽ Ĩ Õ Ỹ Ũ ;

Cns = B C D F G H J K L M N P Q R S T V W X Z G̃ Ñ 
      b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z g̃ ñ ;

ArchiCns = %{N%} %{K%} ;

CnsNorm = B C D F G H J K L P Q R S T V W X Z
          b c d f g h j k l p q r s t v w x z ;

Vows = A Ã E Ẽ I Ĩ O Õ U Ũ Y Ỹ Á É Í Ó Ú Ý
       a ã e ẽ i ĩ o õ u ũ y ỹ á é í ó ú ý ;

VowsTon = Á É Í Ó Ú Ý
          á é í ó ú ý ;

VowsAton = A E I O U Y 
           a e i o u y ;

VowsStrong = A Ã E Ẽ O Õ Á É Ó
             a ã e ẽ o õ á é ó ;

VowsWeak = I Ĩ U Ũ Y Ỹ Í Ú Ý
           i ĩ u ũ y ỹ í ú ý ;

Rules

!"Remove morpheme boundary"
!%>:0 <=> _ ; 

"Remove initial morpheme boundaries"
%>:0 <=> .#. :0* _ ;

"Remove word final hyphen"
%-:0 <=> _ .#. ; 

!"Remove stress marker"
!•:0 <=> _ ;

"Change vowel before atonal suffixes"
Va:Vt <=> _ %>: [m: a: | n: t: e: | i: c: h: a: | %{m%}: e: | g: u: i: | r: e: | m: i:|
                 k: u: r: i: | t: a: | r: a: ʼ: e: | n: e: | n: i: k: o:| v: a: | p: a: ] ;
            [Cns: | VowsAton: | Nas: | ʼ: ]+ _ %>: %{r%}: ;
            _ %{o%}: %>: [v: | a: | g: u: i: | i: c: h: a: ] ;
            except
            [VowsTon:] [ Cns: | VowsAton: |Nas:]+ _ %>: [m: a: | n: t: e: | i: c: h: a:|v: | a: | %{m%}: e:] ;
	      _ %>: v: a: ʼ: e: k: u: e: ;
	      i:  _ %>: ; 
	      i: c: h: _ %>: n: t: e:  ;
	      g: u: _ %>: %{m%}: e: ;
            _ %>: i: c: h: a: %>: %{E%}: t: e: ;
            where Va in ( a e o u y ) 
                  Vt in ( á é ó ú ý ) matched ;

"Change i to tonal before atonal suffixes"
i:í <=>  _ %>: [m: a: | n: t: e:| p: e: | %{r%}:r i: | v: a:] ;
        _ %{o%}: %>: [v: | a:] ; 
	except 
	ó: _ %>: n: t: e: ;

! NOTE: The i--í is taken care of by another rule, to avoid conflict with i:0

"Delete ending -[i] before comparative -icha" 
Vx:0 <=> _ %>: [ i: c: h: a: | %{r%}:0 i: ] ;
            where Vx in ( ĩ i í ) ;

!@ n:n {d}:d >:> a:a {P}:0 m:m o:o m:m i:i c:c h:h ĩ:0 >:> {r}:0 i:i

"Change tonal vowel to atonal if tonal in affix"
Vt:Va <=> •: _ [ Cns: | ArchiCns: | Nas: | VowsAton: |  %>: ]+  VowsTon: ;
          •: _ [ Cns: | %>: | ArchiCns: | Nas: | VowsAton: ]+ %{E%}: ;
          •: _ [ Cns: | %>: | ArchiCns: | Nas: | VowsAton: ]+ [%{Y%}: g: u: a:] ;
          except 
          A: m: •: _ r: i: k: a: %>: [%{Y%}: g: u: a:] %>: %{m%}: e: ;
           where Vt in VowsTon Va in VowsAton matched ; 

!@ •:0 ó:o g:g a:a >:> {N}:0 {K}:k u:u é:é r:r a:a 

!@ •:0 ó:ó g:g a:a >:> p:p e:e

!@ •:0 ó:o g:g a:a >:> g:g u:u a:a

"Add nasal prefix [ñ] in present 1pl incl"
%{J%}:ñ <=> _ [a: | e: | o: ] %{P%}: [ CNAS: | CnsNorm: |VowsAton: | VowsTon:]+ CNAS: ;
            _ [a: | e: | o: ] %{P%}: CNAS: ;
                    where CNAS in Nas ;

"Insert glottal stop ['] if next morpheme starts with a vowel"
%{P%}:ʼ <=> _ [ VowsTon: | •: VowsAton:] ;
            Vows: _ [a: k: u: e:] ;
            Vows: %>: _ ;
            %{b%}: [o: | y:] _ Vows: ;
            r: o: _ Vows: ;
            except
            _ %{i%}: ;

"Surface [n] in plural nouns" 
%{N%}:n <=> Nas: %>: _ ;
            _ %{K%}: k: ;
            VowsWeak: %>: _ ;
            Nas: CnsNorm: Vows: %>: _;
            v: a: %>: _ ;
            VowsWeak: [VowsStrong: | Cns: ]+ %>: :p :e %>: _ ;

"Surface [g] in pl nouns after nasals" 
%{K%}:g <=> Nas: %>: %{N%}: _ ;
            %{N%}: _ k: ;
            v: a: %>: %{N%}: _ ;
            Nas: CnsNorm: Vows: %>: %{N%}: _;
            VowsWeak: %>: %{N%}: _ ;
            VowsWeak: [VowsStrong: | Cns: | %>: ]+ %>: :p :e %>: %{N%}: _ ;

"Possessive {H} before VowsTon"
%{H%}:h <=> _ i: %{I%}: VowsTon: ;


"Remove underlying [i] in 3p possessive prefixes"
%{I%}:0 <=>  _ Cns: ;

"Surface ʼ in possessive prefix i"
%{I%}:ʼ <=> _ VowsTon: ;

"Possessive {I} as j before VowsAton" 
%{I%}:j <=> _ VowsAton:[CnsNorm: | VowsAton: |VowsTon: ] ;


"Possessive %{I%} as ñ in nasal nouns starting with VowsAton"
%{I%}:ñ <=> _ VowsAton: Nas: ;


"Insert [r] before vowels after possessive prefixes"
%{p%}:r <=> _ Vows: ;

"Remove [d] in possessive prefixes" 
%{D%}:0 <=> _ e: %{p%}: [CnsNorm: | VowsAton: |VowsTon: | Nas: | %>:]+ Nas: ;

"Surface [e] after weak vowels in indefinite adjectives" 
%{E%}:e <=> VowsWeak: %>: _ ;

"Remove [d] in negative verbs before nasals"
%{d%}:0 <=> _ %{a%}: %>: [a: |r: e:|o:|%{J%}: a: |r: o:| p: e:] %{P%}: Nas: ;
      
"%{r%} as r in negative verbs ending with i"
%{r%}:r <=> i: %>: _ ;
            :i p: o: %>: _ ;

"Surface [y] in postpositions"
%{Y%}:y <=> g: u: a: %>: _ g: u: a: ;

"Surface [m] in postpositions after nasals"
%{m%}:m <=> NasTil: [Vows:| Cns: | %>:]+ %>: _ ; 
	    NasTil: %>: _ ; 
          %{g%}: %-: _  ;
          n: Vows: %>: _ ;
          except
          ñ: e: m: b: y: %>: _ ;

"Remove surface [t] or [r] in Triformes"
Cx:0 <=> %{t%}: _ ;
         where Cx in Cns;

"Surface [a] in negative verbs"
%{a%}:a <=> _ [ %>: %{J%}: a: | h: a: ʼ: e: | i: k: a: t: u:] ;

"Surface [o] in negative verbs"
%{a%}:o <=> _ %>: r: o: ;

"Surface [e] in negative verbs"
%{a%}:e <=> _ %>: r: e: ;

"Surface [mb] in suffix after nasal verb"
%{b%}:b <=> Nas: %>: %{m%}: _ ;
            %>: m: _ [o: | y:] %{P%}: [CnsNorm: | Vows:] ;

"Remove %{b%} before nasals"
%{b%}:0 <=> %>: m: _ [o: | y:] %{P%}: Nas: ;

"Delete [i] in normal verbs"
%{i%}:0 <=> _ ;
    except 
           :a ([ :0 | %> ]) _ ;
           :r :e ([ :0 | %> ]) _ ;
           :o ([ :0 | %> ]) _ ;
           :j :a ([ :0 | %> ]) _ ;
           :r :o ([ :0 | %> ]) _ ;
           :p :e ([ :0 | %> ]) _ ; 

"Add [i] for aireales" 
%{i%}:i <=> :a ([ :0 | %> ]) _ ;
            :r :e ([ :0 | %> ]) _ ;
            :o ([ :0 | %> ]) _ ;
            :j :a ([ :0 | %> ]) _ ;
            :r :o ([ :0 | %> ]) _ ;
            :p :e ([ :0 | %> ]) _ ; 

!@ >:> a:a {P}:0 {i}:i k:k o:o >:> h:h a:a 

!@ >:> r:r e:e {P}:0 {i}:i k:k o:o >:> h:h a:a

"Always delete %{g%}"
%{g%}:0 <=> _ ;
